Washington statutes.
RCW 26.09.006

Mandatory use of approved forms.

(1) Effective January 1, 1992, a party shall not file any pleading with the clerk of the court in an action commenced under this chapter unless on forms approved by the administrator for the courts.

(2) The parties shall comply with requirements for submission to the court of forms as provided in RCW 26.18.220.

[ 1992 c 229 s 1; 1990 1st ex.s. c 2 s 26.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—Severability—1990 1st ex.s. c 2: See notes following RCW 26.09.100.